Nebraska, session 109, LB1064.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1064 LB1064
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 4 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Large Load Customer Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Large Load Customer Regulation Act:
(1) Large load customer means an entity requesting a new or expanded
interconnection where the total load at a single site would exceed twenty
megawatts;
(2) Onsite backup generating facilities means generation that is not
capable of exporting energy to the transmission grid and that, in the
aggregate, can serve at least fifty percent of onsite demand; and
(3) Public power supplier means a public power district organized
under Chapter 70, article 6, a public power and irrigation district, a
municipality, a registered group of municipalities, an electric
cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed
under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under
the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal
Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental entity providing
electric service.
Sec. 3. (1) Public power suppliers shall establish standards for
interconnecting large load customers in a manner designed to support
business development in this state while mitigating the potential for
stranded infrastructure costs and maintaining system reliability. The
standards shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) A requirement for each large load customer to disclose to the
interconnecting public power supplier whether the customer is pursuing a
substantially similar request for electric service the approval of which
would result in the customer materially changing, delaying, or
withdrawing the interconnection request. The disclosure may redact
competitively sensitive details. The public power supplier shall not
sell, share, or disclose the information submitted to it under this
subdivision;
(b) A requirement for each interconnected large load customer to
-2-

LB1064 LB1064
2026 2026
disclose to the interconnecting public power supplier information about
the customer's onsite backup generating facilities. The public power
supplier shall use such information for purposes of the procedure
described in section 4 of this act;
(c) A flat study fee of at least one hundred thousand dollars to be
paid to the interconnecting public power supplier for initial
transmission screening studies for large loads that exceed the load
threshold described in subdivision (1) of section 2 of this act. A large
load customer that requests additional capacity following the screening
study shall pay an additional study fee based on the new request. The
public power supplier shall complete the screening study within one
hundred eighty days after receiving the study fee;
(d) A method for a large load customer to demonstrate site control
for the proposed load location; and
(e) Financial commitment requirements for the development of
transmission and generation infrastructure needed to serve a large load
customer.
(2) A public power supplier is not required to establish a general
rate tariff for large load customers. A public power supplier is
authorized to establish or negotiate rates, charges, and operating
standards for each large load customer that fairly allocate electricity
system costs to the large load customer and also mitigate (a) operational
and resource adequacy risks and (b) financial risks to other customers,
without regard to the requirements of section 70-655.
(3) A public power supplier may impose electric service requirements
for large load customers on its system in addition to the standards
established under this section.
Sec. 4. Public power suppliers shall develop a procedure to:
(1) Procure demand response, reductions, and load flexibility from
large load customers; and
(2) In the event of an emergency condition, require the affected
-3-

LB1064 LB1064
2026 2026
large load customers to curtail load or, for those customers with onsite
backup generating facilities, to deploy such facilities for the duration
of the emergency condition or until the load can be recalled safely.
-4-